Hawaii statutes.
§432G-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Capitated basis" means fixed per
member per month payment or percentage of premium payment wherein the provider
assumes the full risk for the cost of contracted services without regard to the
type, value, or frequency of services provided. For purposes of this chapter, "capitated
basis" includes the cost associated with operating staff model facilities.

"Carrier" means a dental insurer, a
health maintenance organization, an insurer, a nonprofit hospital and medical
service corporation, a mutual benefit society, or other entity responsible for
the payment of benefits or provision of services under a group contract.

"Commissioner" means the insurance
commissioner.

"Copayment" means an amount an
enrollee must pay to receive a specific service which is not fully prepaid.

"Dental care services" include the
practices, acts, and operations pertaining to dentistry as defined in section
448-1.

"Dental insurance plan" means
insurance, as defined in section 431:1-201, for dental care services.

"Dental insurer" means any person who
undertakes to provide or to arrange for or administer one or more dental
insurance plans and who has met the requirements of chapter 423.

"Dental service corporation" means a
corporation established pursuant to section 423-1.

"Discontinuance" means the termination
of the contract between a group contract holder and a dental insurer due to the
insolvency of the dental insurer, and does not refer to the termination of any
agreement between any individual subscriber and a dental insurer.

"Enrollee" means an individual who is
covered by a dental insurer.

"Evidence of coverage" means a
statement of the essential features and services of the dental insurer coverage
that is given to the subscriber by the dental insurer or by the group contract
holder.

"Grievance" means a written complaint
submitted in accordance with the dental insurer's formal grievance procedure by
or on behalf of an enrollee regarding any aspect of the dental insurer relative
to the enrollee.

"Group contract" means a contract for
dental care services which by its terms limits eligibility to members of a
specified group. The group contract may include coverage for dependents.

"Group contract holder" means the
person to which a group contract has been issued.

"Individual contract" means a
contract for dental care services issued to and covering an individual. The
individual contract may include dependents of the subscriber.

"Insolvent" or "insolvency"
means that the dental insurer has been declared insolvent and placed under an
order of supervision, rehabilitation, or liquidation by the commissioner or a
court of competent jurisdiction.

"Net worth" means the excess of total
assets over total liabilities; provided that liabilities shall not include
fully subordinated debt.

"Participating provider" means a
provider as defined in this section, who, under an express or implied contract
with the dental insurer or with its contractor or subcontractor, has agreed to
provide dental care services to enrollees with an expectation of receiving
payment, other than copayment or deductible, directly or indirectly from the dental
insurer.

"Person" has the same meaning as in
section 431:1-212.

"Provider" means any person licensed
to practice dentistry as defined in section 448-1.

"Replacement coverage" means the
benefits provided by a succeeding carrier.

"Subscriber" means an individual
whose employment or other status, except family dependency, is the basis for
eligibility for enrollment in the dental insurer, or in the case of an
individual contract, the person in whose name the contract is issued.

"Uncovered
expenditures" means the costs to the dental insurer for dental care
services that are the obligation of the dental insurer, for which an enrollee
may also be liable in the event of the dental insurer's insolvency, and for
which no alternative arrangements have been made that are acceptable to the
commissioner. Uncovered expenditures include but are not limited to
out-of-area services, referral services, and hospital services. Uncovered
expenditures shall not include expenditures for services when a provider has
agreed not to bill the enrollee even though the provider is not paid by the
dental insurer, or for services that are guaranteed, insured, or assumed by a
person or organization other than the dental insurer. [L 2013, c 191, pt
of §1; am L 2014, c 186, §17]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next